Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1004
Civil action; authorized.

(1) A person aggrieved by a violation of section 87-1003 may bring a civil action against the commercial entity or third party which engaged in that violation to recover such relief as may be appropriate.

(2) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:

(a) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate;

(b) Damages under subsection (3) of this section; and

(c) At the discretion of the court, reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

(3)(a) A minor or a parent or guardian of such minor aggrieved by a violation of subsection (1) of section 87-1003 may recover actual damages caused by such violation.

(b) An individual whose information was retained in violation of subsection (2) of section 87-1003 may recover actual damages caused by such violation.

Laws 2024, LB1092, § 4.
July 19, 2024